Utah statutes.
17B-1-634.   Receipts for payment.

The district treasurer shall give or cause to be given to every person paying money to the district treasury, a receipt or other evidence of payment, specifying, as appropriate, the date of payment and upon which account paid and shall file the duplicate of the receipt.

